Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-162
Banks; trust department; separation from other departments; powers; duties.

The trust department of a bank when chartered under sections 8-159 to 8-161 shall be separate and apart from every other department of the bank and shall have all of the powers, duties, and obligations of a trust company provided in the Nebraska Trust Company Act.

Laws 1959, c. 19, § 4, p. 144;

Laws 1961, c. 14, § 7, p. 108;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,121;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 62, p. 159;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 12;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 13.

Nebraska Trust Company Act, see section 8-201.01.